Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1837
Money in Victim's Compensation Fund; returned; when.

Upon disposition of charges favorable to any person accused of committing a crime or upon a showing by such person that five years have elapsed from the deposit of money into the Victim's Compensation Fund by the accused pursuant to section 81-1836 and further that no actions are pending against such person pursuant to the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, the committee shall immediately pay the money deposited pursuant to such section by the accused to such person.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 37;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 35;

Laws 1990, LB 87, § 8.